Massachusetts, session 194th, H2861.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1
Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 4(2)(b) and 4(2)(c) of chapter 32 or any other
general or special law to the contrary, Walter Guertin shall receive a retirement allowance based
upon the thirty-two years of creditable service calculated by the Attleboro Retirement Board as
of the date of his retirement, November 17, 2017.
Section 2:
This act shall apply as of November 17, 2017, and the Attleboro Retirement Board shall
pay to Walter Guertin any amounts owed between the date of retirement and the passage of this
act. Said retirement allowance shall be subject to the provisions of section 103 of chapter 32.
of 1